dev/mt_wiktionary/nounNoNumber.all.fat.dix
  <!-- musmar; musmar; 1 -->
    <pardef n="musmar__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- disinn; disinn; 1 -->
    <pardef n="disinn__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- disinn; disinn; 1 -->
    <pardef n="disinn__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- oħt; oħt; 1 -->
    <pardef n="oħt__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- oħt; oħt; 1 -->
    <pardef n="oħt__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- zokkor; zokkor; 1 -->
    <pardef n="zokkor__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- Ċeki; Ċeki; 1 -->
    <pardef n="Ċeki__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- ringiela; ringiela; 1 -->
    <pardef n="ringiela__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- ringiela; ringiela; 1 -->
    <pardef n="ringiela__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- almanakk; almanakk; 1 -->
    <pardef n="almanakk__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- almanakk; almanakk; 1 -->
    <pardef n="almanakk__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- Ċeka; Ċeka; 1 -->
    <pardef n="Ċeka__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- Ċeka; Ċeka; 1 -->
    <pardef n="Ċeka__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- divrenzja; divrenzja; 1 -->
    <pardef n="divrenzja__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- deżerti; deżerti; 1 -->
    <pardef n="deżerti__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- proprjetà; proprjetà; 1 -->
    <pardef n="proprjetà__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- sbuħija; sbuħija; 1 -->
    <pardef n="sbuħija__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- frawla; frawla; 1 -->
    <pardef n="frawla__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- nixxiegħa; nixxiegħa; 1 -->
    <pardef n="nixxiegħa__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- nixxiegħa; nixxiegħa; 1 -->
    <pardef n="nixxiegħa__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- ċena; ċena; 1 -->
    <pardef n="ċena__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- it-tieni; it-tieni; 1 -->
    <pardef n="it-tieni__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- it-tieni; it-tieni; 1 -->
    <pardef n="it-tieni__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- seklu; seklu; 1 -->
    <pardef n="seklu__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- seklu; seklu; 1 -->
    <pardef n="seklu__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- oxx; oxx; 1 -->
    <pardef n="oxx__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- punent; punent; 1 -->
    <pardef n="punent__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- punent; punent; 1 -->
    <pardef n="punent__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- gawwija; gawwija; 1 -->
    <pardef n="gawwija__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- Afgana; Afgana; 1 -->
    <pardef n="Afgana__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- Afgana; Afgana; 1 -->
    <pardef n="Afgana__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- papoċċa; papoċċa; 1 -->
    <pardef n="papoċċa__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- konjugazzjoni; konjugazzjoni; 1 -->
    <pardef n="konjugazzjoni__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- arja; arja; 1 -->
    <pardef n="arja__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- arja; arja; 1 -->
    <pardef n="arja__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- qiegħ_tal-pelvi; qiegħ_tal-pelvi; 1 -->
    <pardef n="qiegħ_tal-pelvi__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- lsien; lsien; 1 -->
    <pardef n="lsien__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- lsien; lsien; 1 -->
    <pardef n="lsien__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- ħadid; ħadid; 1 -->
    <pardef n="ħadid__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- ħadid; ħadid; 1 -->
    <pardef n="ħadid__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- marżepp; marżepp; 1 -->
    <pardef n="marżepp__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- iljunfant; iljunfant; 1 -->
    <pardef n="iljunfant__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="musmar"><i>musmar</i><par n="musmar__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="disinn"><i>disinn</i><par n="disinn__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="disinn"><i>disinn</i><par n="disinn__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="oħt"><i>oħt</i><par n="oħt__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="oħt"><i>oħt</i><par n="oħt__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="zokkor"><i>zokkor</i><par n="zokkor__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="Ċeki"><i>Ċeki</i><par n="Ċeki__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="ringiela"><i>ringiela</i><par n="ringiela__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="ringiela"><i>ringiela</i><par n="ringiela__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="almanakk"><i>almanakk</i><par n="almanakk__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="almanakk"><i>almanakk</i><par n="almanakk__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="Ċeka"><i>Ċeka</i><par n="Ċeka__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="Ċeka"><i>Ċeka</i><par n="Ċeka__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="divrenzja"><i>divrenzja</i><par n="divrenzja__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="deżerti"><i>deżerti</i><par n="deżerti__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="proprjetà"><i>proprjetà</i><par n="proprjetà__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="sbuħija"><i>sbuħija</i><par n="sbuħija__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="frawla"><i>frawla</i><par n="frawla__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="nixxiegħa"><i>nixxiegħa</i><par n="nixxiegħa__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="nixxiegħa"><i>nixxiegħa</i><par n="nixxiegħa__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="ċena"><i>ċena</i><par n="ċena__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="it-tieni"><i>it-tieni</i><par n="it-tieni__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="it-tieni"><i>it-tieni</i><par n="it-tieni__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="seklu"><i>seklu</i><par n="seklu__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="seklu"><i>seklu</i><par n="seklu__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="oxx"><i>oxx</i><par n="oxx__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="punent"><i>punent</i><par n="punent__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="punent"><i>punent</i><par n="punent__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="gawwija"><i>gawwija</i><par n="gawwija__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="Afgana"><i>Afgana</i><par n="Afgana__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="Afgana"><i>Afgana</i><par n="Afgana__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="papoċċa"><i>papoċċa</i><par n="papoċċa__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="konjugazzjoni"><i>konjugazzjoni</i><par n="konjugazzjoni__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="arja"><i>arja</i><par n="arja__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="arja"><i>arja</i><par n="arja__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="qiegħ_tal-pelvi"><i>qiegħ_tal-pelvi</i><par n="qiegħ_tal-pelvi__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="lsien"><i>lsien</i><par n="lsien__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="lsien"><i>lsien</i><par n="lsien__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ħadid"><i>ħadid</i><par n="ħadid__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="ħadid"><i>ħadid</i><par n="ħadid__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="marżepp"><i>marżepp</i><par n="marżepp__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="iljunfant"><i>iljunfant</i><par n="iljunfant__n_m"/></e>
